Vermont, session 2025-2026, H103.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. chapter 88 is added to read:
CHAPTER 88. PROTECTION OF VETERANS’ BENEFITS
§ 1751. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly to protect veterans, their
dependents, and survivors from paying compensation for assistance with filing
veteran-related claims to any person who is not accredited by the U.S.
Department of Veterans or providing assistance in their capacity as an
VT LEG #379332 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.103
2025 Page 2 of 4
employee of the Vermont Office of Veterans Affairs or Vermont Veterans’
Home.
§ 1752. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Compensation” means payment of money, a thing of value, or a
financial benefit.
(2) “Veterans’ benefits matter” means the preparation, presentation, or
prosecution of a claim affecting an individual who has filed or expressed an
intent to file a claim for a benefit, program, service, commodity, function, or
status, entitlement to which is determined under the laws and regulations
administered by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs or the U.S.
Department of Defense pertaining to veterans, their dependents, their
survivors, and any other individual eligible for such benefits.
§ 1753. PROHIBITED CONDUCT
(a) For purposes of this section, “person” does not include an accredited
representative of a recognized organization or an accredited agent or attorney
pursuant to 38 C.F.R. § 14.629 (requirements for accreditation), as amended,
or individuals working within their capacity as employees of the Vermont
Office of Veterans Affairs or the Vermont Veterans’ Home.
(b) The following conduct is prohibited:
VT LEG #379332 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.103
2025 Page 3 of 4
(1) No person shall receive compensation for advising any individual
with regard to any veterans’ benefits matter, except as permitted under Title 38
of the United States Code and the regulations adopted pursuant to Title 38, as
amended.
(2) No person shall receive compensation for referring any individual to
another person for advice, consultation, or assistance with regard to any
veterans’ benefits matter.
(3) No person shall receive compensation for any services rendered
before the date on which a notice of disagreement, decision review, or appeal
is filed, whichever occurs first, with respect to an individual’s veterans’
benefits matter.
(4) No person shall guarantee, either directly or by implication, that any
individual is certain to receive specific veterans’ benefits or that any individual
is certain to receive a specific level, percentage, or amount of veterans’
benefits.
(5) No person offering advice, consultation, or assistance with regard to
any veterans’ benefits matter shall falsely claim or represent, either directly or
indirectly, that the person is sponsored by, affiliated with, or accredited by the
U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, the Vermont Office of Veterans Affairs,
or the Vermont Veterans’ Home.
§ 1754. MEMORIALIZATION OF TERMS
VT LEG #379332 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.103
2025 Page 4 of 4
A person seeking to receive compensation for advising, consulting, or
assisting an individual with a veterans’ benefits matter shall, before rendering
any services, memorialize all terms regarding payment for services to be
rendered in a written agreement, signed by both parties. To be valid, the
written agreement must adhere to all criteria specified in 38 C.F.R. § 14.636(g)
(fee agreements), as amended.
§ 1755. FEES
No person shall receive excessive or unreasonable fees as compensation for
advising or assisting an individual with any veterans’ benefits matter. Factors
to be considered in determining whether fees are excessive or unreasonable
include those specified in 38 C.F.R. § 14.636(e) (fee reasonableness factors),
as amended.
§ 1756. VIOLATION
(a) A violation of this chapter is deemed to be a violation of 9 V.S.A.
§ 2453.
(b) The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney has the same authority to
make rules, conduct civil investigations, enter into assurances of
discontinuance, and bring civil actions, and private parties have the same rights
and remedies, as provided under 9 V.S.A. chapter 63, subchapter 1.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379332 v.1